Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1749
Collection of taxes; settlement of county treasurer; credit for delinquent taxes; audit of treasurer's books.

The Tax Commissioner and other proper authority or person shall in his or her final settlement with the treasurer allow him or her credit for the amount so certified, but if the Tax Commissioner or other proper authority or person shall have reason to believe that the amount stated in the certificate is not correct, or that the allowance was illegally made, he or she shall return the same for correction. When it appears to be necessary in the opinion of the Tax Commissioner or other proper authority or person, he or she shall designate and appoint some competent person to examine the treasurer's books and statement of settlement, and the person so designated and appointed shall have access to the treasurer's books and papers appertaining to such treasurer's office or settlement for the purpose of making such examination.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 174, p. 453;

R.S.1913, § 6502;

C.S.1922, § 6030;

C.S.1929, § 77-1935;

R.S.1943, § 77-1749;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 169;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 83.

County board of equalization is sole judge as to when necessity for examination of accounts of treasurer exists. Kearney County v. Tuttle, 16 Neb. 34, 19 N.W. 637 (1884).

Board of equalization has authority under this section to employ competent person to examine accounts of treasurer. Laws v. Harlan County, 12 Neb. 637, 12 N.W. 114 (1882).